Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-14,124.03
Act or court order; alleged violation; investigation; manner; donor or tax exempt organization; restriction on disclosure of information.

Any investigation of an alleged violation of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act or a court order in an action brought under the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act shall occur in a manner that shields the identity of lawful donors as much as reasonably possible. No state or local government entity, court, or officer of a court may collect or require the submission of information on the identity of any donor to a tax-exempt organization other than information directly related to an alleged violation of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 62.
July 18, 2026